ro-RO: Tipul piesei pentru aparatul de vâslit: Curea/chingă; Cablu/ham; Lanț; Ventilator/volant; Placă pentru picioare; Chingă pentru picioare; Coardă pentru mâner; Mâner/grip; Buton de reglare; Monitor/consolă; Pedală; Scripete; Șină/pistă; Scaun; Rolă pentru scaun; Senzor; Pinion; Rezervor de apă; Roată/rolă directoare; Altele
cs: Typ dílu veslovacího trenažeru: Pás/popruh; Lanko/postroj; Řetěz; Ventilátor/setrvačník; Opěrka nohou; Popruh na nohy; Šňůra rukojeti; Rukojeť/madlo; Otočný knoflík; Monitor/konzole; Pedál; Kladka; Kolejnice/dráha; Sedadlo; Pojezdové kolečko sedadla; Senzor; Řetězové kolo; Nádrž na vodu; Kolo/kolečko; Jiné
da: Deltype til romaskine: Bælte/rem; Kabel/seletøj; Kæde; Ventilator/svinghjul; Fodplade; Fodrem; Snor til håndtag; Håndtag/greb; Knop; Skærm/konsol; Pedal; Remskive; Skinne/spor; Sæde; Sæderulle; Sensor; Tandhjul; Vandtank; Hjul/svinghjul; Andet
it: Tipo di componente per vogatore: Cinghia/fascia; Cavo/imbracatura; Catena; Ventola/volano; Poggiapiedi; Cinturino per i piedi; Cavo della maniglia; Maniglia/impugnatura; Manopola; Monitor/console; Pedale; Puleggia; Binario/guida; Sedile; Rullo del sedile; Sensore; Pignone; Serbatoio dell'acqua; Ruota/rotella; Altro
sk-SK: Typ dielu veslovacieho trenažéra: Pás/popruh; Lanko/postroj; Reťaz; Ventilátor/zotrvačník; Nášľapná doska; Popruh na nohu; Šnúra rukoväti; Rukoväť/úchop; Otočný gombík; Monitor/konzola; Pedál; Kladka; Koľajnica/dráha; Sedadlo; Valček sedadla; Senzor; Ozubené koleso; Nádrž na vodu; Koliesko/otočné koliesko; Iné
th: ประเภทชิ้นส่วนเครื่องพายเรือ: สายพาน/สายรัด; สายเคเบิล/สายรัด; โซ่; พัดลม/ล้อช่วยแรง; แผ่นวางเท้า; สายรัดเท้า; สายดึงด้ามจับ; ด้ามจับ/ที่จับ; ลูกบิด; มอนิเตอร์/คอนโซล; แป้นเหยียบ; รอก; ราง/ลู่; เบาะนั่ง; ลูกกลิ้งเบาะนั่ง; เซ็นเซอร์; สเตอร์; ถังน้ำ; ล้อ/ล้อเลื่อน; อื่นๆ
sv: Deltyp för roddmaskin: Rem/bälte; Kabel/sele; Kedja; Fläkt/svänghjul; Fotplatta; Fotrem; Handtagslina; Handtag/grepp; Vred; Skärm/konsol; Pedal; Remskiva; Skena/spår; Sits; Sitsrulle; Sensor; Kedjekrans; Vattentank; Hjul/länkhjul; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de peça da máquina de remo: Correia/cinta; Cabo/arnês; Corrente; Ventoinha/volante de inércia; Placa para os pés; Cinta para os pés; Cabo da pega; Pega/punho; Manípulo; Monitor/consola; Pedal; Roldana; Calha/carril; Assento; Rolo do assento; Sensor; Roda dentada; Reservatório de água; Roda/rodízio; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta dela za veslaško napravo: Jermen/trak; Kabel/jermenje; Veriga; Ventilator/vztrajnik; Podpora za noge; Trak za stopala; Vrvica ročaja; Ročaj/oprijem; Gumb; Zaslon/konzola; Pedal; Škripec; Tirnica/vodilo; Sedež; Kolesce sedeža; Senzor; Verižnik; Rezervoar za vodo; Kolo/kolesce; Drugo
ko: 로잉 머신 부품 유형: 벨트/스트랩; 케이블/하네스; 체인; 팬/플라이휠; 풋 플레이트; 풋 스트랩; 핸들 코드; 핸들/그립; 노브; 모니터/콘솔; 페달; 풀리; 레일/트랙; 시트; 시트 롤러; 센서; 스프로킷; 물탱크; 휠/캐스터; 기타
pt-BR: Máquina de remo tipo de peça: Cinto/alça; Cabo/arnês; Corrente; Ventilador/volante de inércia; Plataforma para os pés; Alça para os pés; Cordão da alça; Alça/pegador; Manípulo; Monitor/console; Pedal; Polia; Trilho/pista; Assento; Rolo do assento; Sensor; Engrenagem; Tanque de água; Roda/rodízio; Outros
zh-CN: 划船机部件类型: 皮带/绑带; 缆索/线束; 链条; 风扇/飞轮; 踏板; 脚部绑带; 拉绳; 把手/握把; 旋钮; 监视器/控制台; 踏板; 滑轮; 导轨/轨道; 座椅; 座椅滚轮; 传感器; 链轮; 水箱; 轮子/脚轮; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta dijela veslačkog trenažera: Remen/traka; Kabel/remenje; Lanac; Ventilator/zamašnjak; Ploča za stopala; Traka za stopala; Uzica ručke; Ručka/drška; Gumb; Monitor/konzola; Pedala; Kolotur; Vodilica; Sjedalo; Valjak sjedala; Senzor; Lančanik; Spremnik za vodu; Kotačić; Ostalo
zh-TW: 划船機零件類型: 皮帶/綁帶; 纜線/安全帶; 鍊條; 風扇/飛輪; 腳踏板; 腳踏綁帶; 握把拉繩; 握把/手柄; 旋鈕; 螢幕/控制台; 踏板; 滑輪; 軌道/滑軌; 座椅; 座椅滾輪; 感測器; 鏈輪; 水箱; 輪子/腳輪; 其他
ja: ローイングマシン部品の種類: ベルト / ストラップ; ケーブル / ハーネス; チェーン; ファン / フライホイール; フットプレート; フットストラップ; ハンドルコード; ハンドル / グリップ; ノブ; モニター/コンソール; ペダル; プーリー; レール/トラック; シート; シートローラー; センサー; スプロケット; ウォータータンク; ホイール/キャスター; その他
de: Typ des Rudergeräteteils: Riemen/Gurt; Kabel/Kabelbaum; Kette; Lüfter/Schwungrad; Fußplatte; Fußschlaufe; Griffseil; Griff/Haltegriff; Knauf; Monitor/Konsole; Pedal; Seilrolle; Schiene/Laufschiene; Sitz; Sitzrolle; Sensor; Kettenrad; Wassertank; Rad/Rolle; Sonstiges
en: Rowing machine part type: Belt/strap; Cable/harness; Chain; Fan/flywheel; Foot plate; Foot strap; Handle cord; Handle/grip; Knob; Monitor/console; Pedal; Pulley; Rail/track; Seat; Seat roller; Sensor; Sprocket; Water tank; Wheel/caster; Other
lt-LT: Irklavimo treniruoklio dalies tipas: Diržas; Trosas / diržai; Grandinė; Ventiliatorius / smagratis; Pėdų atrama; Pėdų dirželis; Rankenos laidas; Rankena; Rankenėlė; Monitorius / konsolė; Pedalas; Skriemulys; Bėgis / takelis; Sėdynė; Sėdynės ratukas; Jutiklis; Žvaigždutė; Vandens bakas; Ratukas; Kita
pl: Typ części maszyny wioślarskiej: Pasek/taśma; Linka/uprząż; Łańcuch; Wentylator / koło zamachowe; Podstawa pod stopy; Pasek na stopy; Linka uchwytu; Rączka/uchwyt; Pokrętło; Monitor/konsola; Pedał; Koło pasowe; Szyna/prowadnica; Siodełko; Rolka siodełka; Czujnik; Zębatka; Zbiornik na wodę; Koło/kółko; Inne
nb: Deltype romaskin: Belte/stropp; Kabel/sele; Kjede; Vifte/svinghjul; Fotplate; Fotstropp; Håndtaksnor; Håndtak/grep; Knott; Skjerm/konsoll; Pedal; Trinse; Skinne/spor; Sete; Setehjul; Sensor; Tannhjul; Vanntank; Hjul/trinse; Annet
bg-BG: Тип част за гребен тренажор: Ремък/каишка; Кабел/сбруя; Верига; Вентилатор/маховик; Поставка за крака; Каишка за крака; Въже за дръжката; Дръжка/ръкохватка; Въртящо се копче; Монитор/конзола; Педал; Макара; Релса/водач; Седалка; Ролка за седалка; Сензор; Зъбно колело; Резервоар за вода; Колело/ролка; Друго
nl: Roeimachine onderdeeltype: Riem/band; Kabel/harnas; Ketting; Ventilator/vliegwiel; Voetplaat; Voetband; Trekkoord; Handvat/greep; Knop; Monitor/console; Pedaal; Katrol; Rail/baan; Zitting; Zittingrol; Sensor; Tandwiel; Watertank; Wiel/zwenkwiel; Overig
es: Tipo de pieza de la máquina de remo: Cinturón/correa; Cable/arnés; Cadena; Ventilador/volante de inercia; Placa de pie; Correa para el pie; Cuerda del asa; Asa/empuñadura; Perilla; Monitor/consola; Pedal; Polea; Riel/pista; Asiento; Rodillo del asiento; Sensor; Piñón; Tanque de agua; Rueda/rueda pivotante; Otro
hu: Evezőgép-alkatrész típusa: Szíj / heveder; Kábel / kábelköteg; Lánc; Ventilátor / lendkerék; Lábtartó; Lábszíj; Fogantyúzsinór; Fogantyú / markolat; Forgatógomb; Monitor/konzol; Pedál; Csiga; Sín/pálya; Ülés; Ülésgörgő; Érzékelő; Lánckerék; Víztartály; Kerék/görgő; Egyéb
vi: Loại phụ tùng máy chèo thuyền: Đai/dây đeo; Cáp/dây đai; Xích; Quạt/bánh đà; Bàn đạp; Dây đeo chân; Dây kéo tay cầm; Tay cầm/bề mặt bám; Núm vặn; Màn hình/bảng điều khiển; Bàn đạp; Ròng rọc; Đường ray/đường trượt; Ghế ngồi; Con lăn ghế; Cảm biến; Đĩa xích; Bình nước; Bánh xe/bánh xe đúc; Khác
tr: Kürek çekme makinesi parça tipi: Kayış/bant; Kablo/donanım; Zincir; Fan/volan; Ayak plakası; Ayak kayışı; Tutamak kordonu; Tutamak/kavrama yeri; Topuz; Monitör/konsol; Pedal; Makara; Ray/kızak; Oturak; Oturak tekerleği; Sensör; Zincir dişlisi; Su tankı; Tekerlek/rulet; Diğer
fi: Soutulaitteen osan tyyppi: Hihna/remmi; Vaijeri/valjaat; Ketju; Tuuletin/vauhtipyörä; Jalkalevy; Jalkaremmi; Kahvan vetonaru; Kahva/ote; Nuppi; Näyttö/konsoli; Poljin; Hihnapyörä; Kisko/raide; Istuin; Istuimen rulla; Anturi; Ratas; Vesisäiliö; Pyörä/rulla; Muu
fr: Type de pièce pour rameur: Courroie/sangle; Câble/harnais; Chaîne; Ventilateur/volant d’inertie; Repose-pieds; Sangle de pied; Cordon de poignée; Poignée/prise; Molette; Moniteur/console; Pédale; Poulie; Rail/piste; Siège; Roulette de siège; Capteur; Pignon; Réservoir d’eau; Roue/roulette; Autre
ru: Тип детали гребного тренажера: Ремень/лента; Трос/провода; Цепь; Вентилятор/маховик; Платформа для ног; Ремешок для ног; Шнур ручки; Ручка/хват; Ручка / регулятор; Монитор / консоль; Педаль; Шкив; Направляющая / рельс; Сиденье; Ролик сиденья; Датчик; Звёздочка; Бак для воды; Колесо / ролик; Другое
el: Τύπος εξαρτήματος κωπηλατικής μηχανής: Ζώνη/ιμάντας; Καλώδιο/πλεξούδα; Αλυσίδα; Ανεμιστήρας/τροχός; Πλατφόρμα ποδιών; Ιμάντας ποδιών; Κορδόνι λαβής; Λαβή/grip; Κουμπί; Οθόνη/κονσόλα; Πετάλι; Τροχαλία; Ράγα/οδηγός; Κάθισμα; Ροδάκι καθίσματος; Αισθητήρας; Γρανάζι; Δεξαμενή νερού; Τροχός/ροδάκι; Άλλο